Utah statutes.
10-5-125.   Treasurer -- Duties.

(1)  The town treasurer is custodian of all money, bonds, or other securities of the town.

(2)  The town treasurer shall:

(a)  determine the cash requirements of the town and provide for the investment of all money by following the procedures and requirements of Title 51, Chapter 7, State Money Management Act;

(b)  receive all money payable to the town, within three business days after collection, including all taxes, licenses, fines, and intergovernmental revenue;

(c)  keep an accurate detailed account of all money received under Subsection (2)(b) in the manner provided in this chapter and as directed by the town council by ordinance or resolution; and

(d)  collect all special taxes and assessments as provided by law and ordinance.



Amended by Chapter 285, 1992 General Session

